src-fst-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
# Noun inflection
----

## Ad hoc lexica




* **LEXICON N_**

## Substandard lexica

* **LEXICON N_KOL_SUB**

* **LEXICON N_TYERVYE_SUB**



## Standard lexica 

LEXICON N_KOL  кол:кол
Back harmony

LEXICON N_MOER  мӧр:мӧр
Front harmony

* **LEXICON N_MARY** мары:мары
The stem vowel "е" is found with possessor indices and the lative
Back harmony

* **LEXICON N_TYERVYE** тӹрвӹ:тӹрвӹ
The stem vowel "е" is found with possessor indices and the lative
Front harmony

N_KARTA_SUB

* **LEXICON N_KARTA** карта:карта
а is specific to the +Sg+Nom, elsewhere ы or ӹ
Back harmony

* **LEXICON N_BIRZHA** биржа:биржа
а is specific to the +Sg+Nom, elsewhere  ӹ
Front harmony

* **LEXICON N_VAREN1E** варенье:варенье
е is specific to the +Sg+Nom, elsewhere  ӹ
Front harmony

LEXICON N_POCHTA   почта:почта

LEXICON N_OLMA   олма:олма
Back harmony

LEXICON N_AEZAE   ӓзӓ:ӓзӓ
Front harmony

LEXICON N_PECHEN1E   печенье:печенье
Front harmony

LEXICON NMN_KOL  кол:кол
Back harmony


LEXICON NMN_MOER  мӧр:мӧр
Front harmony


* **LEXICON NMN_MARY** мары:мары
The stem vowel "е" is found with possessor indices and the lative
Back harmony


* **LEXICON NMN_TYERVYE** тӹрвӹ:тӹрвӹ
The stem vowel "е" is found with possessor indices and the lative
Front harmony


* **LEXICON NMN_KARTA** карта:карта
Back а/ы
а is specific to the +Sg+Nom, elsewhere ы


* **LEXICON NMN_BIRZHA** биржа:биржа
Front а/ӹ
а is specific to the +Sg+Nom, elsewhere ӹ

* ** :%>ӹ NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-PL_MUTUAL ; ** %>влӓ

* **LEXICON NMN_VAREN1E** варенье:варенье
Front е/ӹ
е is specific to the +Sg+Nom, elsewhere ӹ

* ** :%>ӹ NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE-PL_MUTUAL ; ** %>влӓ

LEXICON NMN_OLMA   олма:олма
Back harmony



LEXICON NMN_AEZAE   ӓзӓ:ӓзӓ
Front harmony



LEXICON NMN_PECHEN1E   печенье:печенье
Front harmony


LEXICON N_AEVAE   ӓвӓ:ӓвӓ











PxSg1+NB+CASE
singular possessa



PxSg1+NB+CASE
singular possessa



























































PXSG3

















































* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-mrj/blob/main/../src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc)</small>
